Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
339K]

NORTHWEST
INTERSTATE COMPACT ON LOW-LEVEL

RADIOACTIVE
WASTE MANAGEMENT

Section

339K-1 Enactment of compact

339K-2 Compact administrator

339K-3 Supplementary agreements

339K-4 Payment of state obligations

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next